Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 21
BONDS

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Law reviews:

For article, "Three Sources of Municipal Revenue in

C

olorado", see 19

C

olo. Law. 2065 (1990).

Section

PART 1 FUNDING - FLOATING DEBT

PART 2 REFUNDING BONDED INDEBTEDNESS

PART 3 PAYMENTS OF MATURED
SPECIAL ASSESSMENT

PART 4 PAYMENT BY TAX LEVY
ON PETITION OF ELECTORS